Utah statutes.
41-8-4.   Operation of a vehicle by a person under 18 -- Use of wireless telephones prohibited -- Exceptions -- Penalty.

(1)  Except as provided in Subsection (2), a person younger than 18 years of age, whether a resident or nonresident of this state, may not use a wireless telephone to communicate with another person while operating a motor vehicle upon a highway of this state.

(2)  It is an affirmative defense to a violation of this section that a person younger than 18 years of age was using a wireless telephone while operating a motor vehicle:

(a)  during a medical emergency;

(b)  when reporting a safety hazard or requesting assistance relating to a safety hazard;

(c)  when reporting a criminal activity or requesting assistance relating to a criminal activity; or

(d)  when communicating with a parent or legal guardian.

(3)  A person who violates this section is guilty of an infraction and shall be fined a maximum of $25.

(4) (a)  A violation of this section is not a reportable violation.

(b)  The Driver License Division may not assess points under Section 53-3-221 against the driving record of the person who violates this section.



Enacted by Chapter 326, 2013 General Session

